nl: UC-platformcertificering: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype voor Bedrijven; Niet gecertificeerd; Zoom; Andere
sk-SK: Certifikácia UC platformy: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype pre firmy; Nepotvrdené; Zoom; Iné
it: Certificazione della piattaforma UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype per le aziende; Non certificato; Zoom; Altro
zh-TW: UC 平台認證: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; 商務用 Skype; 未認證; Zoom; 其他
ko: UC 플랫폼 인증: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; 인증되지 않음; Zoom; 기타
en: UC platform certification: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Uncertified; Zoom; Other
bg-BG: Сертифициране на UC платформа: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype за бизнеса; Несертифициран; Увеличение; Други
pl: Certyfikacja platformy UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype dla firm; Brak certyfikacji; Zoom; Inne
fr: Certification de plateforme UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype Entreprise; Non certifié; Zoom; Autre
ru: Сертификация для платформ УК: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype для бизнеса; Без сертификации; Zoom; Другое
ja: UCプラットフォーム認定: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; 未認証; ズーム; その他
pt-BR: Certificação de plataforma UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype para Empresas; Não certificado; Zoom; Outro
lt-LT: UC platformos sertifikavimas: 8x8; „Amazon Chime“; „Cisco Webex“; „GoToMeeting“; „Google Meet“; „Microsoft Teams“; „RingCentral“; „Skype“ verslui; Nesertifikuotas; „Zoom“; Kita
nb: UC-plattformsertifisering: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Usertifisert; Zoom; Annet
hr-HR: Certifikacija UC platforme: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype za tvrtke; Necertificirano; Zumiranje; Ostalo
da: UC-platformcertificering: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Ikke-certificeret; Zoom; Andet
el: Πιστοποίηση πλατφόρμας UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; Zoom; Άλλο
cs: Certifikace pro platformy sjednocené komunikace: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype pro firmy; Bez certifikace; Zoom; Jiné
sl-SI: Certifikat UC-platforme: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype za podjetja; Nepotrjeno; Povečava; Drugo
th: การรับรองแพลตฟอร์ม UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; Zoom; อื่นๆ
sv: UC-plattformscertifiering: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype för företag; Ocertifierad; Zoom; Övrigt
es: Certificación de plataforma UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Sin certificación; Zoom; Otros
hu: UC-platformtanúsítvány: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Tanúsítvány nélküli; Zoom; Egyéb
fi: UC-alustan sertifiointi: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Sertifioimaton; Zoomaus; Muu
ro-RO: Certificare platformă UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Necertificat; Zoom; Altele
pt-PT: Certificação da plataforma UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype para Empresas; Não certificado; Zoom; Outro
vi: Chứng nhận nền tảng UC: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Chưa được chứng nhận; Zoom; Khác
zh-CN: UC 平台认证: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; 未认证; Zoom; 其他
tr: UC platform sertifikasyonu: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype Kurumsal; Sertifikasız; Yakınlaştırma; Diğer
de: UC-Plattform-Zertifizierung: 8x8; Amazon Chime; Cisco Webex; GoToMeeting; Google Meet; Microsoft Teams; RingCentral; Skype for Business; Nicht zertifiziert; Zoom; Sonstiges